Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6107
Public hearing.

The director shall conduct a public hearing within one hundred and twenty days after the date the application is filed pursuant to section 44-6105 unless extended by the director for good cause. Any interested person may appear or otherwise be heard at the public hearing. The director may in his or her discretion continue the public hearing for a reasonable period of time not to exceed sixty days. The mutual insurer applying to convert to a stock insurer shall give such reasonable notice of the public hearing as the director in his or her discretion shall require.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 47;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 5.